Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.070

Certified feed lot license—Denial, suspension, or revocation—Hearings.

The director is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW if he or she finds that there has been a failure to comply with any requirement of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. Hearings for the revocation, suspension, or denial of a license shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2003 c 326 s 51; 1989 c 175 s 54; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.